Utah statutes.
75-7-105.   Default and mandatory rules.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, this chapter
governs the duties and powers of a trustee, relations among trustees, and the
rights and interests of a beneficiary.
(2)  Except as specifically provided in this chapter, the terms of a trust
prevail over any provision of this chapter except:
(a)  the requirements for creating a trust;
(b)  the duty of a trustee to act in good faith and in accordance with the
purposes of the trust;
(c)  the requirement that a trust and its terms be for the benefit of its
beneficiaries;
(d)  the power of the court to modify or terminate a trust under Sections
75-7-410 through 75-7-416;
(e)  the effect of a spendthrift provision, Section 26-6-14, and the rights of
certain creditors and assignees to reach a trust as provided in Part 5,
Creditor's Claims-Spendthrift and Discretionary Trusts;
(f)  the power of the court under Section 75-7-702 to require, dispense with,
or modify or terminate a bond;
(g)  the effect of an exculpatory term under Section 75-7-1008;
(h)  the rights under Sections 75-7-1010 through 75-7-1013 of a person other
than a trustee or beneficiary;
(i)  periods of limitation for commencing a judicial proceeding; and
(j)  the subject-matter jurisdiction of the court and venue for commencing a
proceeding as provided in Sections 75-7-203 and 75-7-205.
